Illinois, session 104th, HB4923.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Distressed Farmers Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Department" refers to the Department of Agriculture.8    "Distressed farmer" means a farmer or an individual 9principally responsible for farming leased land with fewer 10than 75 acres of land and $500,000 per year in gross revenue or 11a farmer who has been denied a Farm Service Agency number 12despite 5 or more years of farming. 13    Section 10. General provisions. Subject to appropriation, 14the Department shall administer and provide funding for the 15following:16        (1) up to $5,000,000 for paid, year-long 17    apprenticeships for individuals seeking to work in a 18    direct or support capacity of a distressed farmer;19        (2) up to $5,000,000 for distressed farmers 20    specifically in need of wells; and21        (3) up to $10,000,000 for distressed farmers in need 22    of, but not limited to, the following expenses:  HB4923- 2 -LRB104 20148 BDA 33599 b1            (A) repairing tractors, greenhouses, and reefer 2        trucks and other trucks;3            (B) building greenhouses and other covers; and4            (C) purchasing tractors with tillers and other 5        attachments. 6    Section 90. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 7adding Section 253 as follows: 8    (35 ILCS 5/253 new)9    Sec. 253. Distressed farmer credit. 10    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 112026, each taxpayer who is a distressed farmer and who incurs 12qualified farming expenses during the taxable year is entitled 13to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 14of Section 201 in an amount equal to 100% of those qualified 15farming expenses, not to exceed $50,000 per taxpayer in any 16taxable year. 17    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 18taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 19credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 20be carried forward and applied to the tax liability for the 5 21taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 22shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 23liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 24available to offset liability, the earlier credit shall be   HB4923- 3 -LRB104 20148 BDA 33599 b1applied first. 2    (c) As used in this Section: 3    "Distressed farmer" has the meaning set forth in Section 410 of the Distressed Farmers Act. 5    "Grocery store" means a business that is authorized by the 6Department of Human Services to participate in the Women, 7Infants and Children Nutrition program and is primarily 8engaged in retailing a general line of food, such as canned and 9frozen foods; fresh fruits and vegetables; and fresh and 10prepared meats, fish, and poultry. 11    "Qualified farming expense" means an expense related to: 12        (1) repairing tractors, trailers, and other vehicles; 13        (2) purchasing, repairing, or constructing greenhouses 14    and other covers for agricultural products; 15        (3) purchasing tractors with tillers and other 16    attachments; and 17        (4) planting or harvesting food that will be delivered 18    to an underserved community. 19    "Underserved community" means a census tract in this State 20in which:21        (1) at least one of the following conditions applies:22            (A) 20% or more of the households are at or below 23        the federal poverty level, according to the poverty 24        guidelines updated periodically in the Federal 25        Register by the U.S. Department of Health and Human 26        Services; or  HB4923- 4 -LRB104 20148 BDA 33599 b1            (B) the median family income is at or below 80% of 2        the area median family income, as reported in the most 3        recent American Community Survey (ACS) published by 4        the United States Bureau of the Census; and5        (2) in the case of a census tract located in a 6    Metropolitan Statistical Area, at least 33% of the census 7    tract's population lives more than one mile from a grocery 8    store or, in the case of a census tract located outside of 9    a Metropolitan Statistical Area, at least 33% of the 10    census tract's population lives more than 10 miles from a 11    grocery store.